Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1304
Central filing system, defined.

Central filing system shall mean the system for filing effective financing statements or notice of such financing statements established pursuant to section 52-1312 pursuant to section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99-198.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 4.